Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1302
Refunding debentures; form.

Said refunding debentures shall be in substantially the form as provided in section 2-111, Compiled Statutes of Nebraska, 1929.

Laws 1937, c. 2, § 2, p. 53;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1602;

R.S.1943, § 2-1302;

Laws 1983, LB 421, § 9.